Nebraska, session 109, LB693.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB693 LB693
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
87-302 (a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in
the course of his or her business, vocation, or occupation, he or she:
(1) Passes off goods or services as those of another;
(2) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the
source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services;
(3) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to
affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by,
another;
(4) Uses deceptive representations or designations of geographic
origin in connection with goods or services;
(5) Represents that goods or services have sponsorship, approval,
characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do
not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status,
affiliation, or connection that he or she does not have;
(6) Represents that goods or services do not have sponsorship,
approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities
that they have or that a person does not have a sponsorship, approval,
status, affiliation, or connection that he or she has;
(7) Represents that goods are original or new if they are
deteriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand,
except that sellers may repair damage to and make adjustments on or
replace parts of otherwise new goods in an effort to place such goods in
compliance with factory specifications;
(8) Represents that goods or services are of a particular standard,
quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if
they are of another;
(9) Disparages the goods, services, or business of another by false
or misleading representation of fact;
(10) Advertises goods or services with intent not to sell them as
-2-

LB693 LB693
2025 2025
advertised or advertises the price in any manner calculated or tending to
mislead or in any way deceive a person;
(11) Advertises goods or services with intent not to supply
reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a
limitation of quantity;
(12) Makes false or misleading statements of fact concerning the
reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;
(13) Uses or promotes the use of or establishes, operates, or
participates in a pyramid promotional scheme in connection with the
solicitation of such scheme to members of the public. This subdivision
shall not be construed to prohibit a plan or operation, or to define a
plan or operation as a pyramid promotional scheme, based on the fact that
participants in the plan or operation give consideration in return for
the right to receive compensation based upon purchases of goods,
services, or intangible property by participants for personal use,
consumption, or resale so long as the plan or operation does not promote
or induce inventory loading and the plan or operation implements an
appropriate inventory repurchase program;
(14) With respect to a sale or lease to a natural person of goods or
services purchased or leased primarily for personal, family, household,
or agricultural purposes, uses or employs any referral or chain referral
sales technique, plan, arrangement, or agreement;
(15) Knowingly makes a false or misleading statement in a privacy
policy, published on the Internet or otherwise distributed or published,
regarding the use of personal information submitted by members of the
public;
(16) Uses any scheme or device to defraud by means of:
(i) Obtaining money or property by knowingly false or fraudulent
pretenses, representations, or promises; or
(ii) Selling, distributing, supplying, furnishing, or procuring any
property for the purpose of furthering such scheme;
-3-

LB693 LB693
2025 2025
(17) Offers an unsolicited check, through the mail or by other
means, to promote goods or services if the cashing or depositing of the
check obligates the endorser or payee identified on the check to pay for
goods or services. This subdivision does not apply to an extension of
credit or an offer to lend money;
(18) Mails or causes to be sent an unsolicited billing statement,
invoice, or other document that appears to obligate the consumer to make
a payment for services or merchandise he or she did not order;
(19)(i) Installs, offers to install, or makes available for
installation or download a covered file-sharing program on a computer not
owned by such person without providing clear and conspicuous notice to
the owner or authorized user of the computer that files on that computer
will be made available to the public and without requiring intentional
and affirmative activation of the file-sharing function of such covered
file-sharing program by the owner or authorized user of the computer; or
(ii) Prevents reasonable efforts to block the installation,
execution, or disabling of a covered file-sharing program;
(20) Violates any provision of the Nebraska Foreclosure Protection
Act;
(21) In connection with the solicitation of funds or other assets
for any charitable purpose, or in connection with any solicitation which
represents that funds or assets will be used for any charitable purpose,
uses or employs any deception, fraud, false pretense, false promise,
misrepresentation, unfair practice, or concealment, suppression, or
omission of any material fact;
(22)(i) In the manufacture, production, importation, distribution,
promotion, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sale of
a substance:
(A) Makes a deceptive or misleading representation or designation,
or omits material information, about a substance or fails to identify the
contents of the package or the nature of the substance contained inside
-4-

LB693 LB693
2025 2025
the package; or
(B) Causes confusion or misunderstanding as to the effects a
substance causes when ingested, injected, inhaled, or otherwise
introduced into the human body.
(ii) A person shall be deemed to have committed a violation of the
Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act for each individually packaged
product that is either manufactured, produced, imported, distributed,
promoted, displayed for sale, offered for sale, attempted to sell, or
sold in violation of this section. A violation under this subdivision (a)
(22) shall be treated as a separate and distinct violation from any other
offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the
person was in violation of this section;
(23)(i) Manufactures, produces, publishes, distributes, monetizes,
promotes, or otherwise makes publicly available any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct, any obscene material, or any material that is
harmful to minors in which any person depicted as a participant or
observer:
(A) Is under eighteen years of age;
(B) Is a trafficking victim;
(C) Has not expressly and voluntarily consented to such person's
depiction; or
(D) Participated in any act depicted without consent.
(ii) This subdivision (a)(23) does not apply to any
telecommunications service.
(iii) For purposes of this subdivision (a)(23):
(A) Harmful to minors has the same meaning as in 47 U.S.C. 254, as
such section existed on January 1, 2024;
(B) Obscene material has the same meaning as in section 28-807;
(C) Promote means to use any mechanism or publication, or take any
action, that suggests, highlights, advertises, markets, curates,
backlinks, hashtags, or otherwise directs, attempts to direct, or
-5-

LB693 LB693
2025 2025
encourages traffic toward specific materials, including acts carried out
affirmatively, through automation, algorithmically, and via other
technical means both known and unknown at this time;
(D) Publish means to communicate or make information available to
another person via an Internet website, regardless of whether the person
consuming, viewing, or receiving the material gives any consideration for
the published material;
(E) Trafficking victim has the same meaning as in section 28-830;
(F) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct has the same
meaning as in section 28-1463.02; and
(G) Without consent has the same meaning as in section 28-318; or
(24) Offers or enters into a right-to-list home sale agreement as
defined in section 81-885.01; or .
(25)(i) Advertises, promotes, offers, sells, performs, or contracts
to perform any service in violation of subdivision (ii) or (iii) of this
subdivision (a)(25).
(ii) Except as permitted under state or federal law, no person shall
receive compensation, directly or indirectly, for preparing, presenting,
prosecuting, advising, consulting, or assisting any individual with
regard to any veterans benefits matter before the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, the United States Department of Defense,
or the Nebraska Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(iii) Except as permitted under state or federal law, no person
shall receive compensation, directly or indirectly, for referring any
individual to another person to prepare, present, prosecute, advise,
consult, or provide assistance regarding any veterans benefits matter
before the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the United
States Department of Defense, or the Nebraska Department of Veterans'
Affairs.
(iv) For purposes of this subdivision (a)(25):
(A) Veterans benefits matter means the preparation, presentation, or
-6-

LB693 LB693
2025 2025
prosecution of any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed
an intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity,
function, or status, to which entitlement is determined under the laws
and regulations administered by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, the United States Department of Defense, or the Nebraska
Department of Veterans' Affairs pertaining to veterans, their dependents
or survivors, or any other individual eligible for such benefit, program,
service, commodity, function, or status; and
(B) Compensation means payment of any money, thing of value, or
financial benefit.
(v) Nothing in this subdivision (a)(25) shall be construed to
prohibit a division of fees between attorneys that is otherwise proper
under Nebraska law and the Nebraska Rules of Professional Conduct.
(vi) This subdivision (a)(25) does not apply to county veterans
service officers.
(b) In order to prevail in an action under the Uniform Deceptive
Trade Practices Act, a complainant need not prove competition between the
parties.
(c) This section does not affect unfair trade practices otherwise
actionable at common law or under other statutes of this state.
Sec. 2. Original section 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-7-